Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201847-201.02
Inmate communications; Jail Standards Board; duties.

The Jail Standards Board shall ensure that city jails are providing inmates with means to communicate by telephone or videoconferencing with inmates' families, loved ones, and counsel.

Laws 2018, LB776, § 9.
July 19, 2018